Louisiana, session 2026, HB611.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part VI-H of Chapter 11 of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 40: 2180.31 through R.S. 40:2180.38, is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Part VI-H. LICENSING OF PREGNANCY HELP CENTERS
§2180.31. Short title
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Pregnancy Help Center
Healthcare Licensing Act".
§2180.32. Purpose
The purpose of this Part is to authorize the Louisiana Department of Health
to promulgate and publish rules and regulations for the licensing of pregnancy help
centers to increasingly provide services that involve medical screening, diagnostics,
or counseling presented as healthcare.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1020 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 611
§2180.33. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Client" means any individual who receives services from a pregnancy
help center.
(2) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health.
(3) "Healthcare services" means services that constitute or involve medical
care, including but not limited to any of the following:
(a) Pregnancy testing.
(b) Ultrasound imaging.
(c) Medical screening or diagnostic services.
(d) Pregnancy counseling or consultation presented as medical advice.
(4) "Licensed healthcare facility" means a facility licensed by the department
pursuant to Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(5) "Pregnancy help center" means any organization, center, or facility,
whether for-profit or nonprofit, that has as its primary purpose the provision of
pregnancy-related services, counseling, testing, or information.
§2180.34. Licensure requirement
A. Any pregnancy help center that provides healthcare services shall be
licensed by the department as a healthcare facility.
B. No pregnancy help center shall provide healthcare services unless and
until it has obtained such licensure.
C. Pregnancy help centers that provide only non-medical services including
peer counseling, material assistance, education, or religious counseling and do not
provide healthcare services shall not be subject to licensure under this part.
§2180.35. Licensing Standards and Oversight
A. The Department shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act establishing minimum standards for licensure
which shall include but not be limited to:
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1020 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 611
(1) Staff qualifications and scope-of-practice requirements.
(2) Clinical supervision by appropriately licensed medical professionals.
(3) Infection control and equipment safety standards.
(4) Client confidentiality and compliance with applicable privacy laws.
(5) Record keeping and reporting requirements.
(6) Complaint and inspection procedures.
B. Standards adopted pursuant to this Part shall be comparable to those
applied to similarly situated outpatient healthcare facilities and shall not impose
requirements unrelated to patient safety or quality of care.
§2180.36. Inspections and compliance
A. Licensed pregnancy help centers shall be subject to all of the following:
(1) Initial licensure inspections.
(2) Periodic inspections, including unannounced inspections, as determined
by the department.
B. The department may investigate complaints alleging violations of this Part
of applicable regulations.
§2180.37. Enforcement and penalties
A. The department may deny, suspend, or revoke licensure for violations of
this Part or rules adopted pursuant thereto.
B. Any pregnancy help center that knowingly provides healthcare services
without required licensure shall be subject to any of the following:
(1) Civil penalties not to exceed five thousand dollars per violation per day.
(2) Injunctive relief to prevent continued unlicensed operation.
C. The attorney general may bring an action to enforce the provisions of this
Part.
§2180.38. Construction
Nothing in this Part shall be construed to:
(1) Require any pregnancy help center to provide or refer for abortion
services.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1020 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 611
(2) Regulate religious doctrine, prayer, or counseling unrelated to healthcare
services.
(3) Limit speech or advocacy not connected to the provision of healthcare.
Section 2. (A) Pregnancy help centers providing healthcare services on the effective
date of this Act shall have six months to apply for licensure.
(B) During the transition period such centers may continue operations while their
licensure application is pending provided they comply with interim standards established by
the department.
Section 3. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.